Hawaii statutes.
[§342F-11.5] Disposition of
collected fines and penalties. Fines and penalties collected under
sections 342F-9 and 342F-11 shall be deposited into the environmental response
revolving fund established by section 128D-2. [L 1991, c 157, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next